North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 6. Treasurer.
§ 147-83.
Receipts from federal government not affected.

General Statutes 147-77, 147-78, 147-80, 147-81, 147-82, 147-83 and 147-84 shall not be held or construed to affect or interfere with the receipts and disbursements of any funds received by any institution or department of this State from the federal government when in the act of Congress, relating to such funds received from the federal government, a contrary disposition or handling is prescribed or required, and the said sections shall not apply to any moneys paid to any department, institution or agency, or undertaking of the State of North Carolina, as a part of any legislative appropriation, or allotment from any contingent fund, as provided by law, after the same has been paid out of the State treasury.

History.

1925, c. 128, s. 6; 2019-250, s. 5.7(b).

§ 147-84.
Refund of excess payments.

Whenever taxes or other receipts of any kind are or have been by clerical error, misinterpretation of the law, or otherwise, collected and paid into the State treasury in excess of the amount found legally due the State, said excess amount shall be refunded to the person entitled thereto.

History.

1925, c. 128, s. 7; 1983, c. 913, s. 54.

§ 147-85.
Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of the State government shall annually close on the thirtieth day of June.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 77; 1883, c. 60; Code, s. 3360; 1885, c. 334; 1905, c. 430; Rev., s. 5378; C.S., s. 7692; 1921, c. 229; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 7; 1925, c. 89, s. 21; 1983, c. 913, s. 55.

§ 147-86.
Additional clerical assistance authorized; compensation and duties.

The State Treasurer, by and with the consent and advice of the Governor and Council of State, is authorized to employ an additional clerk in the Treasury Department, whose compensation and duties shall be fixed by the State Treasurer, by and with the consent and advice of the Governor and Council of State. The compensation of such additional clerk as may be employed pursuant to this section shall be paid as other officers and clerks are paid.

History.

1923, c. 172; C.S., s. 7693 (a).

§ 147-86.1.
Pool account for local government unemployment compensation.

The State Treasurer is authorized to establish a pool account, in accordance with rules of the Division of Employment Security (DES), in cooperation with any one or more units of local government, for the purpose of reimbursing the DES for unemployment benefits paid by the DES and chargeable to each local unit of government participating in the pool account. In the pool account established pursuant to this section, the funds contributed by a unit of local government shall remain the funds of the particular unit, and interest or other investment income earned by the pool account shall be prorated and credited to the various contributing local units on the basis of the amounts thereof contributed, figured according to an average periodic balance or some other sound accounting principle.

The State Treasurer shall pay to the Division of Employment Security, within 25 days from receipt of a list thereof, all unemployment benefits charged by the DES to each unit of local government participating in the pool account from the funds in the pool account belonging to each such unit, to the extent that said funds are sufficient to do so.

Notwithstanding the participation by a unit of local government in the pool account authorized by this section, such unit shall remain liable to the Division of Employment Security for any benefits duly charged by the Division to the unit which are not paid by the State Treasurer from funds in the pool account belonging to the unit. Notwithstanding its participation in the pool account, each unit of local government shall continue to maintain an individual account with the DES.

The Director of the Budget shall be authorized to transfer from the interest earned on the pool account, to the State Treasurer’s departmental budget, such funds as may be necessary to defray the Treasurer’s cost of administering the pool account.

History.

1977, c. 1124; 1983, c. 717, s. 89; 2011-401, s. 3.23.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 3.23, effective November 1, 2011, in subsection (a), deleted “and regulations” following “rules,” substituted “Division of Employment Security (DES)” for “Employment Security Commission,” and twice substituted “DES” for “Employment Security Commission” and “Commission”; in subsections (b) and (c), substituted “Division of Employment Security” for “Employment Security Commission”; in subsection (b), substituted “DES” for “Commission”; and in subsection (c), substituted “Division” for “Commission” and “DES” for “Employment Security Commission.”

§ 147-86.2.
Information Technology fees; dispute resolution panel.

The State Treasurer or the State Treasurer’s designee, in conjunction with the State Controller and the State Budget Officer or their designees, shall handle the resolution of fee disputes between the Department of Information Technology and the State agencies receiving information technology services from the Department.

History.

2009-136, s. 3; 2015-241, s. 7A.3.

§§ 147-86.3 through 147-86.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.